Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) To the extent practicable, each county auditor shall schedule the following meetings with each Indian tribe located in whole or in part within the county:(a) Not later than August 1st of each odd-numbered year, a meeting to discuss the details for the next regularly scheduled election cycle. Such a meeting may address, without limitation:(i) The establishment and operation of voting centers or ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation and the size requirements for any such voting centers or ballot drop boxes;(ii) The dates and times of the upcoming elections for which voting centers or ballot drop boxes may be established;(iii) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled election cycle for the Indian tribe to submit a request for the establishment of voting centers or ballot drop boxes;(iv) Responsibilities for the recruitment of election officers; and(v) Any other information relating to the establishment and operation of voting centers and ballot drop boxes;(b) Not later than September 1st of each odd-numbered year, a meeting to confirm any details relating to the establishment and operation of voting centers or ballot drop boxes. Such a meeting may address, without limitation:(i) Whether the Indian tribe will request or has requested to establish any voting centers or ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation and the size requirements for any such voting centers and ballot drop boxes;(ii) The days and hours of any voting center or ballot drop box established within an Indian reservation;(iii) Election officers for any voting center or ballot drop box established within an Indian reservation; and(iv) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled election cycle for the Indian tribe to submit a request for the establishment of voting centers or ballot drop boxes; and(c) A meeting on an ongoing basis during the year of an election if an Indian tribe elects to establish any voting centers or ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation.(2) If a county auditor:(a) Is unable to make contact with an Indian tribe to carry out the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the county auditor shall contact the secretary of state to facilitate contact; or(b) Has not contacted an Indian tribe, a representative of the Indian tribe may contact the secretary of state to facilitate contact.(3) The tribal liaison designated by the secretary of state may assist the county auditor or an Indian tribe to facilitate any contact required pursuant to this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The secretary of state shall establish an electronic ballot portal to be available for the following registered voters:(a) Service voters as defined under RCW 29A.04.163;(b) Overseas voters as defined under RCW 29A.04.109;(c) Disabled voters as defined under RCW 29A.04.037; and(d) Any elector who is a member of an Indian tribe and resides on an Indian reservation.(2) Only the voters described in subsection (1) of this section shall be permitted to use an approved portal to return voted ballots.(3) The secretary of state may approve a portal for use by county election offices and voters described in subsection (1) of this section in returning voted ballots. Any approved portal must be renewed annually and may be removed under circumstances determined by the secretary of state by rule to ensure the integrity and security of elections and protect the secrecy of each vote.(a) The secretary of state must develop and test electronic methods of ballot return for voters described in subsection (1) of this section that are secure against electronic monitoring and incursion or interference, provide the maximum level of voter secrecy and privacy available, and ensure that only a single vote is cast by any voter.(b) The secretary of state may establish rules governing the use of any approved portal including times of availability, storage of ballots, and any processes necessary to facilitate the use of the portal by a voter described in subsection (1) of this section to return a voted ballot.(c) The secretary of state may establish reasonable rules related to the standards and procedures for the examination and testing of any portal to be used by voters described in subsection (1) of this section.(d) Each county election office using an approved portal for the return of voted ballots must keep a record of every attempt at ballot return, successful and unsuccessful, and prepare a report at the conclusion of each voting period listing the number of ballots returned using the portal and confirming that only voters described in subsection (1) of this section used the portal. The report must be submitted to the secretary of state using the deadlines contained in RCW 29A.60.190.(e) The secretary of state shall aggregate the information provided by each county and include it in the statewide reconciliation report required under RCW 29A.60.235.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) A work group is created to advise the office of the secretary of state in their work to implement the electronic ballot portal established in section 2 of this act.(2) The work group must be chaired by the secretary of state, or the secretary's designee, and include at a minimum the following members, appointed by the secretary of state:(a) Two county auditors or their designees, with one auditor residing in western Washington and one auditor residing in eastern Washington;(b) A representative from the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance;(c) A representative from a nonprofit educational research organization with expertise in electronic voting methods; and(d) Other recognized experts and staff as deemed necessary by the work group's chair.(3) This section expires January 1, 2034.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. As used throughout this chapter, "Indian tribe" means any federally recognized Indian tribe whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The provisions of this chapter must be implemented by January 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.--- END ---